Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
ARTICLE 4 Conservatorship
§ 93-20-419.
Conservator’s plan.

If required by the court, a conservator must file with the court a plan for investing, protecting, managing, expending, and distributing the assets of the conservatorship estate no later than ninety (90) days after the court’s order of appointment or order to file a plan. If a plan is required and there is a significant change in circumstances, or if the conservator seeks to deviate significantly from the conservator’s plan, a conservator must file with the court a revised plan no later than ninety (90) days after the change in circumstances or decision to deviate from the plan. Every plan must be based on the needs of the ward and take into account the best interest of the ward as well as the ward’s preferences, values, and prior directions, to the extent known to or reasonably ascertainable by the conservator. Along with other items determined necessary by the court, the conservator’s plan must include:

A budget containing projected expenses and resources, including an estimate of the total amount of fees the conservator anticipates charging per year and a statement or list of the amount the conservator proposes to charge for each service the conservator anticipates providing to the individual;

How the conservator will involve the individual in decisions about management of the conservatorship estate;

Any step the conservator plans to take to develop or restore the ability of the ward to manage the conservatorship estate; and

An estimate of the duration of the conservatorship.

A conservator must give reasonable notice of the filing of the conservator’s plan under subsection (1), together with a copy of the plan, to the ward, a person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) or a court order, and any other person the court determines. The notice must include a statement of the right to object to the plan and be given not later than fourteen (14) days after the filing.

A ward and any person entitled under subsection (2) to receive notice and a copy of the conservator’s plan may object to the plan.

The court must review the conservator’s plan filed under subsection (1) and determine whether to approve the plan or require a new plan. In deciding whether to approve the plan, the court shall consider objections made under subsection (3) and whether the plan is consistent with the conservator’s duties and powers. The court may not approve the plan until thirty (30) days after its filing.

After a conservator’s plan under this section is approved by the court, the conservator must provide a copy of the plan to the ward, a person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) or a court order, and any other person the court determines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-420.
Inventory; records.

Unless the inventory requirement has been waived, not later than ninety (90) days after appointment, a conservator must prepare and file with the appointing court a detailed inventory of the conservatorship estate, together with an oath or affirmation that the inventory is believed to be complete and accurate as far as information permits.

A conservator must give reasonable notice of the filing of an inventory to the ward, a person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) or a court order, and any other person the court determines. The notice must be given not later than fourteen (14) days after the filing.

A conservator must keep records of the administration of the conservatorship estate and make them available for examination on reasonable request of the ward, a guardian for the ward, or any other person the conservator or the court determines.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-421.
Administrative powers of conservator not requiring court approval.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 93-20-414 or qualified or limited in the court’s order of appointment and stated in the letters of conservatorship, a conservator has all powers granted in this section and any additional power granted to a trustee by law of this state other than this chapter.

The court may authorize the conservator in a court order to execute powers not listed in Section 93-20-414 without prior specific court authorization or confirmation, including by way of illustration, but not limited to, the following:

To collect, hold, and retain property, including property in which the conservator has a personal interest and real property in another state, until the conservator determines disposition of the property should be made;

To receive additions to the conservatorship estate;

To continue or participate in the operation of a business or other enterprise;

To acquire an undivided interest in property in which the conservator, in a fiduciary capacity, holds an undivided interest;

To acquire or dispose of personal property;

To continue to invest assets;

To deposit funds or other property in a financial institution, including one operated by the conservator;

To grant an option involving disposition of property or accept or exercise an option for the acquisition of property;

To vote a security, in person or by general or limited proxy;

To pay a call, assessment, or other sum chargeable or accruing against or on account of a security;

To sell or exercise a stock subscription or conversion right;

To consent, directly or through a committee or agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

To hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the conservatorship so that title to the security may pass by delivery;

To insure:

The conservatorship estate, in whole or in part, against damage or loss in accordance with Section 93-20-418(10); and

The conservator against liability with respect to a third person;

Advance funds for the protection of the conservatorship estate or the ward and all expenses, losses, and liability sustained in the administration of the conservatorship estate or because of holding any property for which the conservator has a lien on the conservatorship estate;

Pay a tax, assessment, compensation of the conservator or any guardian, and other expense incurred in the collection, care, administration, and protection of the conservatorship estate;

Pay a sum distributable to the ward or an individual who is in fact dependent on the ward by paying the sum to the distributee or for the use of the distributee:

To the guardian for the distributee;

To the custodian of the distributee under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Section 91-20-1 et seq.; or

If there is no guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, to a relative or other person having physical custody of the distributee;

Defend an action, claim, or proceeding in any jurisdiction for the protection of the conservatorship estate or the conservator in the performance of the conservator’s duties;

Structure the finances of the ward to establish eligibility for a public benefit, including by making gifts consistent with the ward’s preferences, values, and prior directions, if the conservator’s action does not jeopardize the ward’s welfare and otherwise is consistent with the conservator’s duties; and

Execute and deliver any instrument that will accomplish or facilitate the exercise of a power of the conservator.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-422.
Distribution from conservatorship estate.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 93-20-414 or qualified or limited in the court’s order of appointment and stated in the letters of conservatorship, and unless contrary to a conservator’s plan under Section 93-20-419, the conservator may expend or distribute income or principal of the conservatorship estate for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the ward or an individual who is in fact dependent on the ward, including the payment of child or spousal support, without specific court authorization or confirmation in accordance with the following rules:

The conservator shall consider a recommendation relating to the appropriate standard of support, care, education, health, or welfare for the ward or individual who is dependent on the ward, made by a guardian for the ward, if any, and, if the ward is a minor, a recommendation made by a parent of the minor. If the minor has a father or mother, the court shall determine whether the expense of maintaining and educating the minor shall be borne by the ward’s estate.

The conservator acting in compliance with the conservator’s duties under Section 93-20-418 is not liable for an expenditure or distribution made based on a recommendation under paragraph (a) unless the conservator knows the expenditure or distribution is not in the best interest of the ward.

In making an expenditure or distribution under this section, the conservator must consider:

The size of the conservatorship estate, the estimated duration of the conservatorship, and the likelihood the ward, at some future time, may be fully self-sufficient and able to manage the individual’s financial affairs and the conservatorship estate;

The accustomed standard of living of the ward and individual who is dependent on the ward;

Other funds or sources used for the support of the ward; and

The preferences, values, and prior directions of the ward.

Funds expended or distributed under this section may be paid by the conservator to any person, including the ward, as reimbursement for expenditures the conservator might have made, or in advance for services to be provided to the ward or individual who is dependent on the ward if it is reasonable to expect the services will be performed and advance payment is customary or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-423.
Conservator’s report and accounting; monitoring.

Except as otherwise provided under subsection (11), a conservator must file a report in a record regarding the administration of the conservatorship estate with the court annually unless the court otherwise directs, if provided by will, or made necessary by resignation or removal, or termination of the conservatorship. A conservator must petition the court for approval of a report filed under this section. The court, after review, may approve the report.

A report under subsection (1) must state or contain:

An accounting that lists property included in the conservatorship estate and the receipts, disbursements, liabilities, and distributions during the period for which the report is made;

A list of the services provided to the ward;

A statement whether the conservator has deviated from the plan and, if so, how the conservator has deviated and why;

A recommendation as to the need for continued conservatorship and any recommended change in the scope of the conservatorship;

Anything of more than de minimis value which the conservator, any individual who resides with the conservator, or the spouse, parent, child, or sibling of the conservator has received from a person providing goods or services to the ward; and

Any business relationship the conservator has with a person the conservator has paid or that has benefited from the property of the ward.

The court, in its discretion, may request a copy of the most recent reasonably available financial statements evidencing the status of bank accounts, investment accounts, and mortgages or other debts of the ward with all but the last four (4) digits of the account numbers and social security number redacted;

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to review a report under this section or a conservator’s plan under Section 93-20-419, to interview the ward or conservator, or to investigate any other matter involving the conservatorship. In connection with the report, the court may order the conservator to submit the conservatorship estate to appropriate examination in a manner the court directs.

Reasonable notice of the filing under this section of a conservator’s report, together with a copy of the report, must be provided to the ward, a person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) or a court order, and other persons the court determines. The notice and report must be given not later than fourteen (14) days after filing.

The court may establish procedures for monitoring a report submitted under this section and review each report at least annually unless otherwise directed by the court. The court must consider whether:

The reports provide sufficient information to establish that the conservator has complied with the conservator’s duties;

The conservatorship should continue; and

The conservator’s requested fees, if any, should be approved.

If the court determines there is reason to believe a conservator has not complied with the conservator’s duties or the conservatorship should not continue, the court:

Shall notify the ward, the conservator, and any other person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) or a court order;

May require additional information from the conservator;

May appoint a guardian ad litem to interview the ward or conservator or investigate any matter involving the conservatorship; and

Consistent with Sections 93-20-429 and 93-20-430, may hold a hearing to consider removal of the conservator, termination of the conservatorship, or a change in the powers granted to the conservator or terms of the conservatorship.

If the court has reason to believe fees requested by a conservator are not reasonable, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to adjust the requested fees.

An order may be entered, after notice and consideration by the court, approving a report of a conservator filed under this section.

A conservator may seek an order, after notice and hearing, approving a report filed under this section that discharges the conservator from all liabilities, claims, and causes of action by a person given notice of the report and the hearing as to a matter adequately disclosed in the report.

When the funds and personal property of the ward do not exceed the sum or value of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and there is no foreseeable prospect of further receipt to come into the hands of the conservator other than interest thereon, or in conservatorships in which the only funds on hand or to be received by the guardian are funds paid or to be paid by a government agency providing protective services to adults or children for the benefit of the ward, the chancery court or chancellor in vacation, for good cause shown, in the chancellor’s discretion and upon being satisfied it is to the best interest and welfare of the ward, may authorize the guardian to dispense with further annual accounts, except for a final account.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-424.
Attempted transfer of property by the ward.

The interest of a ward in property included in the conservatorship estate is not transferrable or assignable by the ward and is not subject to levy, garnishment, or similar process for claims against the ward unless allowed under Section 93-20-427.

If a ward enters into a contract after the right to enter the contract has been delegated to another by the court, the contract is void against the ward and the ward’s property but is enforceable against the person that contracted with the ward.

A person other than the conservator that deals with a ward with respect to property included in the conservatorship estate is entitled to protection provided by law of this state other than this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-425.
Transaction involving conflict of interest.

A transaction involving a conservatorship estate which is affected by a substantial conflict between the conservator’s fiduciary duties and personal interests is voidable unless the transaction is authorized by court order after notice to persons entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) or a court order. A transaction affected by a substantial conflict includes a sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the conservatorship estate entered into by the conservator, an individual with whom the conservator resides, the spouse, descendant, sibling, or attorney of the conservator, or a corporation or other enterprise in which the conservator has a substantial beneficial interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-426.
Protection of person dealing with conservator.

A person that assists or deals with a conservator in good faith and for value in any transaction, other than a transaction requiring a court order under Section 93-20-414, is protected as though the conservator properly exercised any power in question. Mere knowledge by a person that the person is dealing with a conservator does not require the person to inquire into the existence of authority of the conservator or the propriety of the conservator’s exercise of authority, but restrictions on authority stated in letters of conservatorship, or otherwise provided by law, are effective as to the person. A person that pays or delivers property to a conservator is not responsible for proper application of the property.

Protection under subsection (1) extends to a procedural irregularity or jurisdictional defect in the proceeding leading to the issuance of letters of conservatorship and does not substitute for protection for a person that assists or deals with a conservator provided by comparable provisions in law of this state other than this chapter relating to a commercial transaction or simplifying a transfer of securities by a fiduciary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-427.
Presentation and allowance of claim.

A conservator may pay, or secure by encumbering property included in the conservatorship estate, a claim against the conservatorship estate or the ward arising before or during the conservatorship, on presentation and allowance in accordance with the priorities under subsection (5) or (6). A claimant may present a claim by filing the claim with the court, in a form acceptable to the court, and sending or delivering a copy of the claim to the conservator.

A presented claim is allowed if it is not disallowed in whole or in part by the conservator in a record sent or delivered to the claimant not later than ninety (90) days after its presentation. Before payment, the conservator may change an allowance of the claim to a disallowance in whole or in part, but not after allowance under a court order or order directing payment of the claim. Presentation of a claim tolls the running of a statute of limitations that has not expired relating to the claim until thirty (30) days after disallowance of the claim.

A claimant whose claim has not been paid may petition the court to determine the claim at any time before it is barred by a statute of limitations, and the court may order its allowance, payment, or security by encumbering property included in the conservatorship estate. If a proceeding is pending against the ward at the time of appointment of the conservator or is initiated after the appointment, the moving party must give the conservator notice of the proceeding if it could result in creating a claim against the conservatorship estate.

If a conservatorship estate is likely to be exhausted before all existing claims are paid, the provisions of the law on proceedings to insolvency and distribution of assets of insolvent estates shall, as far as applicable and not otherwise provided, be observed and enforced.

When the claims are established and the amount of assets ascertained, the court shall adjudge the pro rata share of each claimant, deducting first the preference claims in the following order:

Costs and expenses of administration;

A claim of the federal or state government having priority under law other than this article;

A claim incurred by the conservator for support, care, education, health, or welfare previously provided to the ward or an individual who is in fact dependent on the ward;

A claim arising before the conservatorship; and

All other claims.

Preference may not be given in the payment of a claim under subsection (5) over another claim of the same class. A claim due and payable may not be preferred over a claim not due unless:

Doing so would leave the conservatorship estate without sufficient funds to pay the basic living and health-care expenses of the ward; and

The court authorizes the preference under Section 93-20-414(1)(h).

If assets of a conservatorship estate are adequate to meet all existing claims, the court, acting in the best interest of the ward, may order the conservator to grant a security interest in the conservatorship estate for payment of a claim at a future date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-428.
Personal liability of conservator.

Except as otherwise agreed by a conservator, the conservator is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in a fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the conservatorship estate unless the conservator fails to reveal the conservator’s representative capacity in the contract or before entering into the contract.

A conservator may be personally liable for an obligation arising from control of property of the conservatorship estate or an act or omission occurring in the course of administration of the conservatorship estate only if the conservator is personally grossly negligent or in breach of fiduciary duty.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a conservator in a fiduciary capacity, an obligation arising from control of property included in the conservatorship estate, or a tort committed in the course of administration of the conservatorship estate may be asserted against the conservatorship estate in a proceeding against the conservator in a fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is personally liable for the claim.

A question of liability between a conservatorship estate and the conservator personally may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge, or indemnification or another appropriate proceeding or action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-429.
Removal of conservator; appointment of successor.

The court may remove a conservator for failure to perform the conservator’s duties or other good cause and appoint a successor conservator to assume the duties of the conservator.

The court must hold a hearing to determine whether to remove a conservator and appoint a successor on:

A petition of the ward, conservator, or person interested in the welfare of the ward that contains allegations which, if true, would support a reasonable belief that removal of the conservator and appointment of a successor may be appropriate, but the court may decline to hold a hearing if a petition based on the same or substantially similar facts was filed during the preceding six (6) months;

Communication from the ward, conservator, or person interested in the welfare of the ward which supports a reasonable belief that removal of the conservator and appointment of a successor may be appropriate; or

Determination by the court that a hearing would be in the best interest of the ward.

Notice of a petition under subsection (2)(a) must be given to the ward, the conservator, and any other person the court determines.

A ward who seeks to remove the conservator and have a successor appointed has the right to choose an attorney to represent the ward in this matter. If the ward is not represented by an attorney, the court may appoint an attorney under the same conditions as in Section 93-20-406. The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the attorney as provided in Section 93-20-118.

In selecting a successor conservator, the court must follow the priorities under Section 93-20-410.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-430.
Termination or modification of conservatorship.

A conservatorship must be terminated when the minor becomes an adult, becomes emancipated, or dies; the termination must comply with Section 93-20-423, but a conservatorship may continue into adulthood when the court finds the ward qualifies for conservatorship as an adult under the provisions of subsections (5) and (6).

A ward, the conservator, or a person interested in the welfare of the individual may petition for:

Termination of the conservatorship on the ground that a basis for appointment under Section 93-20-401 does not exist or termination would be in the best interest of the ward or for other good cause; or

Modification of the conservatorship on the ground that the extent of protection or assistance granted is not appropriate or for other good cause shown.

The court must hold a hearing to determine whether termination or modification of a conservatorship is appropriate on:

A petition that contains allegations which, if true, would support a reasonable belief that termination or modification of the conservatorship may be appropriate, but the court may decline to hold a hearing if a petition based on the same or substantially similar facts was filed within the preceding six (6) months;

A communication from the ward, conservator, or person interested in the welfare of the ward which supports a reasonable belief that termination or modification of the conservatorship may be appropriate, including because the functional needs of the ward or supports or services available to the ward have changed;

A report from a guardian or conservator which indicates that termination or modification may be appropriate because the functional needs or supports or services available to the ward have changed or other less restrictive alternative is available; or

A determination by the court that a hearing would be in the best interest of the ward.

Notice of a petition under this section must be given to the ward, the conservator, and any other person the court determines.

On presentation of prima facie evidence for termination of a conservatorship, the court must order termination unless it is proven that a basis for appointment of a conservator under Section 93-20-401 exists.

The court must modify the powers granted to a conservator if the powers are excessive or inadequate due to a change in the abilities or limitations of the ward, the ward’s supports, or other circumstances.

Unless the court otherwise orders for good cause, before terminating a conservatorship, the court shall follow the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward which apply to a petition for conservatorship.

A ward who seeks to terminate or modify the terms of the conservatorship has the right to choose an attorney to represent the ward in this matter. If the ward is not represented by an attorney, the court may appoint an attorney under the same conditions as in Section 93-20-406. The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the attorney as provided in Section 93-20-118.

On termination of a conservatorship other than by reason of the death of the ward, property of the conservatorship estate passes to the ward. The order of termination must direct the conservator to file a final report and petition for discharge on approval by the court of the final report.

If a ward dies testate, the conservator must deliver the will to the named representative and certify that delivery to the court. If the ward dies intestate, Section 91-7-68 governs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-431.
Transfer for benefit of minor without appointment of conservator.

Unless a person required to transfer funds or other property to a minor knows that a conservator for the minor has been appointed or a proceeding is pending for conservatorship, the person may transfer an amount or value not exceeding Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) in a twelve-month period to:

A person who has care or custody of the minor and with whom the minor resides;

A guardian for the minor;

A custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Section 91-20-1 et seq.; or

A financial institution as a deposit in an account or certificate solely in the name of the minor; notice of the deposit must be given to the minor; or

An Achieving a Better Life Experience (ABLE) account.

A person that transfers funds or other property under this section is not responsible for its proper application.

A person that receives funds or other property for a minor under subsection (1)(a) or (b) may apply it only to the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor, and may not derive a personal financial benefit from it, except for reimbursement for necessary expenses. Funds not applied for these purposes must be preserved for the future support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor, and the balance, if any, transferred to the minor when the minor becomes an adult or otherwise is emancipated.

Contributions to an ABLE account, and the provisions for permissible disbursements from such account, are governed by 26 U.S.C. Section 529A and the terms of the applicable ABLE plan. The amount of annual contributions is subject to 26 U.S.C. Section 2503(b).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.